Wyoming, session 2025, SF0170.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 23-1-302 by creating a new subsection
(s) is amended to read:

23-1-302. Powers and duties.

(s) The commission and department shall not take or
engage in any management actions or activities for grizzly
bears unless the action is expressly required by statute or
SF0170

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0740
the action is necessary for the public safety and welfare.
This subsection shall apply until the date on which the
grizzly bear in Wyoming is delisted under the federal
Endangered Species Act and primary management of the
grizzly bear is returned to the state.

Section 2. The game and fish commission shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0170